California statutes. Fish and Game Code
In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the legal rate of interest on unsatisfied judgments, as provided in Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1049, Sec. 48.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

8070.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the department to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person paying the amount or by any person other than the person who paid the amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Reduction Permits [8075. - 8080.]

8075.

The commission may grant a permit, subject to such regulations as it may prescribe, to take and use fish by a reduction or extraction process.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8076.

No reduction of fish shall be permitted which may tend to deplete the species, or result in waste or deterioration of fish.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8077.

No permit shall be issued except after a public hearing and a finding by the commission that the granting thereof would promote the economic utilization of the fish resources of the State in the public interest. In making such finding the commission shall take into consideration the interest of the people of the State in the utilization and conservation of the fish supply and all economic and other factors relating thereto, including the efficient and economical operation of reduction plants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8078.

A hearing pursuant to this article shall be held within 30 days after application for a permit, upon such notice as the commission shall prescribe. The commission may extend such a hearing from time to time for a total period of not more than 30 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8079.

The commission shall, whenever necessary to prevent overexpansion, to insure the efficient and economical operation of reduction plants, or to otherwise carry out the provisions of this article, limit the total number of permits which are granted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8079.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or regulation adopted pursuant to this code, the director or a representative appointed by the director, may, without notice or a hearing, grant a license to a fish reduction plant to dispose of dead or dying fish. The license may be immediately issued by the director or the director’s representative whenever that person determines, in that person’s discretion, that an emergency situation exists. The estimated tonnage to be reduced shall be specified as a limit in the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 89.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8080.

Nothing in this article restricts the power of any court in any proceeding relating to any matter arising out of the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Limited Entry Fisheries [8100. - 8103.]

8100.

“Limited entry fishery” means a fishery in which the number of persons who may participate or the number of vessels that may be used in taking a specified species of fish is limited by statute or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.

(a) Any licensed fisherman shall be eligible for inclusion during the initial year of a limited entry fishery which is established by statute that becomes operative after January 1, 1982, or by regulation that becomes operative after January 1, 1999, regardless of the prescribed conditions for entry into the fishery, if the fisherman presents to the department satisfactory evidence that he or she has been licensed as a California commercial fisherman for at least 20 years and has participated in the fishery for at least one of those 20
 years, with qualifying participation in the fishery to be determined by the commission based on landings or other appropriate criteria.

(b) Fishermen who have established eligibility to participate in a limited entry fishery under this section are subject to conditions of continuing eligibility established by statute or regulation if those fishermen desire to maintain their eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that, in some limited entry fisheries, two or more partners may be operating with one of the partners holding the permit to participate in the fishery. The Legislature further finds and declares that undocumented, de facto, family partnerships are a longstanding custom in these fisheries. The Legislature further finds and declares that great hardship results when the permittee partner is no longer able to continue working and leaves the other partner without a permit to continue participating in the fishery.

(b) In any limited entry
 fishery in which permits are allocated to participants in the fishery, and where the death, incapacity, or retirement of a permittee from that fishery would deprive a working partner of the permittee of the ability to continue to derive a livelihood from that fishery, a permit shall be issued, upon application, to one remaining partner.

(c) A working partner for the purposes of this section shall be a spouse, child (including an adopted child), or sibling of the permittee, whose investment or equity need not be proven by documentation, or a person who can prove an investment or equity in the vessel or gear used in the fishery, and who would otherwise have been eligible for a permit and did not obtain one because he or she was working with or was a partner with the permittee.

(d) The working partner shall also provide substantial evidence of an actual physical working participation
 aboard the vessel supported by the submission of documents filed with the Franchise Tax Board and supported by trip settlement sheets or similar documents that demonstrate earnings from that participation. “Trip settlement sheet” means a document prepared after a vessel has completed a fishing trip which displays the costs incurred, revenues received, and profits paid out. Investment or equity alone does not establish that the person is a working partner.

(e) Those existing working partners other than the family relationships specified in subdivision (c) may, not later than February 1, 1984, declare and prove the working partnership in a manner satisfactory to the department and request that the department state the fact of the working partnership upon the permit. Thereafter, a nonfamily working partnership shall be declared, proved, and noted upon any limited entry permit at the first issuance of the permit.

(f) This article does not apply to permits to take herring for roe in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1505, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The accidental death of a limited entry permittee results in great hardships on the permittee’s family.

(2) Under the law as it existed immediately prior to January 1, 1987, if a member of the permittee’s family has not been actively working in the fishery, the limited entry permit could not be transferred to a member of the family, an action which deprives the family of the opportunity to continue to derive a livelihood from the fishery and which
 imposes greater hardships.

(3) When there is an accidental death of a limited entry permittee, a transition period is necessary to allow a family member to join the fishery and to become acclimated, knowledgeable, and experienced in the fishery.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 8102, the department shall transfer a permit for a limited entry fishery, upon application, to a parent, spouse, child, or sibling of a permittee whose death was the result of an accident which occurred after January 1, 1986.

(c) Application for the transfer of a permit pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be made on or before January 1, 1987, or not more than one year after the death of the permittee, whichever is later.

(d) The director may authorize another person, when requested by
 the new permittee, to serve in the place of the new permittee and to engage in fishing activities under the authority of the limited entry permit for not more than two years from the date of the permit transfer.

(e) “Accidental death” means death resulting directly and solely from any of the following:

(1) An accidental injury visible on the surface of the body or disclosed by an autopsy, sustained solely by external, violent, and accidental means.

(2) A disease or infection resulting directly from an accidental injury and beginning within 30 days after the date of the injury.

(3) An accidental drowning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 120, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Far Offshore Fishing [8110. - 8114.]

8110.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that dramatic changes have very recently taken place in the methods and geographic areas of effort by California-based commercial fishermen.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that because the conditions which now exist could not be seen at the time of their inception, some existing regulations are now unreasonably restrictive. In some cases, existing statutes and regulations prohibit California fishermen from participating in or landing in California the primary product, or the incidental product, of their effort in the
 newly developed far offshore fisheries. This situation is detrimental to the interests of the fishermen, the fish processors, and the consumers of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8111.

“Far offshore fishery” means a fishery that lies outside the United States 200-mile exclusive economic zone, as defined by paragraph (6) of Section 1802 of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8112.

Notwithstanding any other section of this code, fish taken in a far offshore fishery, which may be lawfully imported, may be landed in this state by persons operating a commercial fishing vessel registered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 7880) who took the fish in the far offshore fishery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 619, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8113.

(a) Prior to departure from any port in the United States for the purpose of taking fish in the far offshore fishery, the operator of any vessel landing fish in California that will be taken in the far offshore fishery shall file a declaration with the department on forms prescribed by the department.

(b) The declaration shall be valid when signed by the vessel operator and completed with information prescribed by the department.

(c) Upon completion of the trip and within 12 hours of arrival at a port in this state, the operator of the vessel shall complete and submit the return portion of the declaration to the department.

(d) This section does not apply to any commercial fisherman using or possessing only troll lines, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 9025.5, or gear for angling, as defined in Section 15, for the taking or possession of albacore only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8114.

It is unlawful for the operator of any vessel operating under authority of this article to fish in, or land fish from, any waters within the United States 200-mile exclusive economic zone during any trip for which the operator filed a declaration with the department to fish in the far offshore fishery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 619, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. High Seas Interception of Salmon [8120. - 8123.]

8120.

The definitions in this section govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Environmental purpose” means the intent to prevent or minimize adverse ecological effects to water quality.

(b) “High seas interception” means the unauthorized taking of salmon for commercial purposes outside the United States 200-mile fishery conservation zone. “Unauthorized” means contrary to a statute or regulation of the United States or this state or to a treaty or international fishery agreement, or in violation of a foreign law.

(c) “Humanitarian purpose” means the intent to provide medical services for a sick or injured person, or to prevent the loss of human life.

(d) “Process” means affecting the condition or location of salmon, including preparation, packaging, storage, refrigeration, or transportation.

(e) “Written instrument” means hand written or printed matter, including vessels’ logs and papers, bills of lading and sale, documents relating to processing, shipping, and customs, and information stamped on or affixed to cans, crates, containers, freight, or other means of storage or packaging.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 745, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8121.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) To buy, sell, trade, process, or possess salmon, or attempt to buy, sell, trade, process, or possess salmon, with the knowledge that the salmon has been, or will be, obtained by high seas interception.

(b) To knowingly provide financing, premises, equipment, supplies, services, power, or fuel used to buy, sell, trade, process, or possess salmon that has been, or will be, obtained by high seas interception.

(c) Act as a broker or middleman, or otherwise act on behalf of another person, to arrange for or negotiate, or attempt to arrange for or negotiate, the purchase, sale, trade, processing, or possession of salmon, with the knowledge that the salmon has been, or will be, obtained by high seas interception.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 745, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8122.

It is unlawful for any person to create, circulate, or possess any written instrument related to salmon with the knowledge that the written instrument conveys misleading or untrue information about the ownership, possession, processing, origin, destination, route of shipping, type, or condition of salmon, or the time, place, and manner of the taking of the salmon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 745, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8123.

(a) If any person knows that a vessel contains salmon obtained by high seas interception or that the owner or operator of the vessel intends to engage in the high seas interception of salmon, it is unlawful for that person to do any of the following:

(1) Move persons, cargo, or other property to or from the vessel.

(2) Service or repair the vessel or its equipment.

(3) Provide the vessel with power, supplies, equipment, or fuel.

(4) Provide the vessel with information, other than weather reports, capable of aiding the high seas interception of salmon or frustrating or avoiding detection, including communicating the movements, intentions, or activities of state or federal law enforcement officials or other fishing vessels.

(5) Permit the vessel to dock or anchor, or to remain docked or anchored, if that person is responsible for the operation of the facility, harbor, or anchorage.

(b) This section does not prohibit any person from performing any act or acts set forth in subdivision (a), if that person reasonably believes that the act or acts were necessary for humanitarian or environmental purposes or to prevent a significant loss of property, if that person provides immediate notice, by the quickest available means, to the United States Coast
 Guard, the department, or any law enforcement agency as to the type of assistance provided and the circumstances involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 745, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Commercial Fisheries Capacity Reduction Program [8125. - 8126.]

8125.

There is hereby established the Commercial Fisheries Capacity Reduction Account in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. Fees collected pursuant to Section 8126 shall be deposited into the account. Money in the account shall be used to repay the California fishermen’s share of any federal loans used in the federal West Coast Groundfish Fishery Capacity Reduction Program (Sec. 212, P.L. 107-206). The commission may establish, by regulation, any additional program elements necessary to conform state law to federal law, in order to allow California groundfish fishermen
 to fully participate in the federally established buy-back program for the Pacific groundfish fishery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8126.

The commission shall establish a capacity reduction fee on the taking of certain species of fish and shellfish, consistent with the West Coast Groundfish Fishery Capacity Reduction Program. In establishing the fee, the commission shall also consider the administrative cost associated with collecting these fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Particular Varieties of Fish [8140. - 8599.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Season [8140. - 8140.]

8140.

All fish, the taking of which is not otherwise restricted for commercial purposes, by state or federal law or any regulations adopted pursuant to those laws, may be taken at any time for commercial purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sardines [8150.5. - 8154.]

8150.5.

(a) Sardines may not be taken or possessed on any boat, barge, or vessel except pursuant to Section 8150.7.

(b) This section does not prohibit the possession or use of sardines imported into this state under a bill of lading identifying the country of origin.

(c) Imported sardines may be used for dead bait under regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8150.7.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the sardine resource be managed with the objective of maximizing the sustained harvest. The department shall manage the sardine resource in conformance with the federal fishery regulations as recommended by the Pacific Fishery Management Council and as adopted by the Secretary of Commerce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8154.

No person shall receive, possess, or sell sardines for any purpose except for that purpose specified on the fish receipt completed at the time of landing of those sardines pursuant to Section 8043.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 858, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Anchovies [8180. - 8190.]

8180.

In any district or part of a district lying south of a line drawn east and west through Point Mugu, anchovies may be taken in any quantity for bait or for human consumption in a fresh state, or, by contract with the department, for hatchery food, not to exceed 500 tons per year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8181.

Anchovies taken south of that line in waters not less than three nautical miles from the nearest point of land on the mainland shore, and anchovies taken north of that line in any waters, may be possessed, transported, sold, or otherwise dealt with in any district or part of a district south of that line.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8182.

The operator of a boat engaged in taking anchovies in waters south of the line described in Section 8180 shall at all times while operating the boat identify it by displaying on an exposed part of the superstructure, amidships on each side and on top of the house visible from the air, the department registration number of the boat, in 14-inch black numerals on white background.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 90.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8183.

(a) No anchovies may be taken for any purpose in Humboldt Bay, except under the following conditions:

(1) Anchovies may be taken between May 1 and December 1.

(2) Not more than 60 tons of anchovies may be taken
 between May 1 and December 1 of each year.

(3) Only bait nets, as defined in Section 8780, shall be used to take anchovy.

(4) Any game fish caught incidentally in bait nets shall be released by use of a hand scoop net or by dipping the cork line.

(b) An accurate record of all fishing operations shall be kept and is subject to inspection by the department.

(c) The commission may adopt
 regulations it determines are necessary to protect anchovy in Humboldt Bay, including, if applicable and based on credible science, a regulation that changes the permitted take amount established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 985, Sec. 5.   (SB 1309)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8190.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California that the anchovy resource shall be managed in a manner which insures the continued abundance of the species. To that end, the department shall conduct, or have others conduct, annual anchovy egg-larvae surveys or any other annual surveys, research, and analyses necessary to insure that an accurate biomass estimate is made.

(b) This section shall become operative, and activities shall be carried out pursuant to this section only in the event, and to the extent, that funding is made available for such activities by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Salmon [8210.2. - 8226.]

8210.2.

Except as modified by the director pursuant to Section 7652, salmon may be taken under authority of a commercial fishing license and a commercial fishing salmon stamp only in Districts 6, 7, 10, 11, 16, 17, 18, and 19. All species of salmon, except silver salmon, may be taken only between April 15 and September 30. Silver salmon may be taken only between May 15 and September 30. No king salmon may be possessed that is less than 26 inches in length and no silver salmon may be possessed that is less than 22 inches. The length of salmon is to be measured from the tip of the snout to the extreme tip of the tail without resorting to any force other than swinging or fanning the tail. Salmon may be taken for commercial purposes only by hook and line and there is no bag limit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

8213.

During the period when salmon may not be taken for commercial purposes in any district, salmon may be sold in that district only under the regulations of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8214.

It is unlawful to take salmon for commercial purposes at the mouth of Humboldt Bay in those portions of Districts 6 and 7 within three nautical miles north and south of a line drawn due west for three nautical miles from the center of the mouth of that bay.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8215.

Silver salmon may not be sold or possessed in, or transported through, District 6, 7, 10, 11, 16, 17, or 18, during the time when the taking of silver salmon for commercial purposes is unlawful in those districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1009, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8217.

Salmon may be sold subject to the exceptions and restrictions contained in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8218.

It is unlawful to gaff, club, otherwise injure, or possess any king or silver salmon under the legal size.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 189.)
-------------------------------------------

8219.

Salmon may not be taken for commercial purposes in District 6 at the mouths of the Smith and Klamath Rivers within three nautical miles north and south of a line drawn due west for three nautical miles from the center of the mouth of each of those streams, or during the months of August and September in District 7 at the mouth of the Eel River within two nautical miles north and south of a line drawn due west for two nautical miles from the center of the mouth of that stream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8226.

(a) Notwithstanding any measurement requirements under this code, and to implement the department’s salmon tagging program, any person in possession of a salmon with a missing adipose fin, the small, fleshy fin on the back of the fish between the back fin and the tail, upon request by an authorized agent or employee of the department, shall immediately relinquish the head of the salmon to the state, at no charge, for recovery of any coded-wire tag. The head may be removed by the fish owner or, if removed by the official department representative, the head shall be removed in a manner to minimize loss of salmon flesh and the salmon shall immediately be returned to the rightful owner.

(b) It is unlawful to intentionally conceal, cull, or release into the waters, a salmon with a missing adipose fin that it is otherwise legal to possess.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 502, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Commercial Salmon Vessel Permits [8230. - 8248.]

8230.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that commercial salmon fishing is in the public interest and that the preservation of commercial salmon fishing directly affects the health and welfare of the public. The Legislature further finds and declares that, due to past declines in salmon stocks, the increase in the quality and value of salmon on the market, the number and types of vessels being used, the commensurate salmon fishing potential of the commercial salmon fishing fleet, and the demand for entry into the commercial salmon fishery, it is necessary and proper to limit the persons who are eligible to take salmon for commercial purposes and to regulate the amount of salmon that may be taken by restricting the number and salmon fishing potential of the vessels in the commercial salmon fishing fleet in order to preserve and rebuild the salmon resource, to protect commercial salmon fishing, and thereby to protect the health and welfare of the public.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares the following:

(1) The salmon resource declined in 1983 and 1984 as a result of the most severe warm water El Nino current of this century, which caused major disruptions and hardship in the commercial salmon fishery. Habitat destruction in the rivers of California has also depleted the salmon stocks which are bred and reared in those rivers.

(2) The Pacific Fishery Management Council has imposed season closures on the taking of salmon since 1982, including a total prohibition on commercial taking of salmon in 1985 along portions of the northern California coast to protect the king salmon stock from the Klamath River. In 1987, a five-year agreement was signed which allocates the king salmon stock from the Klamath River between ocean commercial and recreational users and in-river Indian and recreational users. This agreement may result in further closures.

(3) Nearly 30 percent of the commercial salmon fishing vessels which were permitted to take salmon for commercial purposes in California did not record landings of salmon in the 1986 and 1987 commercial salmon seasons.

(4) There are more than enough commercial salmon fishing vessels for which commercial salmon fishing permits have been issued to harvest the less than 10 million pounds of salmon that are currently available annually. With the present fleet makeup between large vessels and small vessels and between full-time and part-time fishermen, it is estimated that the present resource capacity may accommodate a fleet of not more than 2,500 permitted vessels. Therefore, no new permits should be issued until the time that the fleet size falls below 2,500 permitted vessels. Adequate provision for entry of new persons or vessels to the commercial salmon fishery is afforded by transfers of vessels for which permits have been issued and renewed and by transfers of those existing permits to vessels of the same or less salmon fishing potential.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8231.

The following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Agent” means the person designated in writing by the owner as the owner’s representative.

(b) “Change of ownership” means the transfer of ownership of a permitted vessel to a new owner.

(c) “Commercial salmon vessel permit” means an annual permit issued by the department to an owner of a commercial fishing vessel for use of that vessel to take salmon for commercial purposes and shall not be considered personal property.

(d) “Fishing potential” means the capability and capacity for harvesting salmon of a particular commercial fishing vessel.

(e) “Permit” means a commercial salmon vessel permit as defined in subdivision
 (c).

(f) “Permitted vessel” means a commercial fishing vessel for which a permit is currently valid.

(g) “Replacement vessel” means a commercial fishing vessel for the use of which a permit is proposed to be transferred pursuant to this article.

(h) “Transfer” means the issuance of a permit for use of a replacement vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 2.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8232.

It is unlawful to take or possess salmon for commercial purposes on a vessel unless all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The vessel is registered with the department pursuant to Section 7881, and the owner of the vessel has a valid commercial salmon vessel permit for the use of that vessel.

(b) The permit for the use of the vessel is affixed to the vessel adjacent to the department registration number unless otherwise authorized by the department.

(c) The permit affixed to the vessel is visible at all times.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 849, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8232.5.

(a) Except as provided in this section, it is unlawful to take salmon for sport purposes on a permitted vessel.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit taking salmon for sport purposes under a sportfishing or a sport ocean fishing license, which is issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7145) of Chapter 1, on a vessel licensed as a commercial passenger fishing boat pursuant to Section 7920 and engaged in that business on any day when salmon are not being taken for commercial purposes on that vessel.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit taking salmon for sport purposes under a sportfishing or a sport ocean fishing license, which is issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7145) of Chapter 1, on a permitted vessel in the Klamath Management Zone, as designated by the federal Pacific Fisheries Management Council, when the commercial salmon season is closed and after 24 hours after the time when salmon taken during the commercial salmon season are required to be landed.

(d) The use of a vessel pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be considered as being engaged or employed exclusively in the taking and possession of fish or other living resource of the sea for commercial purposes for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 227 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1633, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8233.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a permit shall be renewed prior to expiration. Each permit issued by the department shall display the expiration date on the face of the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8233.3.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the department shall issue a permit, upon application and payment of the renewal fees pursuant to Section 8235, that is valid for the subsequent permit year, to the owner of a permitted vessel that is registered with the department pursuant to Section 7881.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 849, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8233.4.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the department shall issue a permit, upon payment of the transfer fees pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8239 and surrender to the department of the permit for the use of the permitted vessel, to the owner of a replacement vessel that is registered with the department pursuant to Section 7881, if the transfer has been approved pursuant to Section 8241.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 849, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8233.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, the department shall change the designation of the holder of a permit to the new owner of a permitted vessel upon receipt of a notice of change of ownership of the permitted vessel, whether the change of ownership is by contract, by operation of law, or otherwise.

(b) The permit shall not be transferred to any other vessel, except by the issuance of a permit for use of the replacement vessel pursuant to subdivision (c) and Sections 8239 to 8241, inclusive.

(c) The owner of the permitted vessel may seek to retire the permitted vessel from the commercial salmon fishery and apply for transfer of the permit, to be issued pursuant to Section 8241, for use
 of a replacement vessel.

(d) A permit changed pursuant to this section is valid for the permit year during which it is issued.

(e) Upon change of the designation of the holder of the permit, all rights, privileges, and obligations of a permit holder, including rights of renewal, are transferred to the new owner of a permitted vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 151.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8233.8.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the department shall issue a permit to the owner of a commercial salmon fishing vessel that is registered with the department pursuant to Section 7881 for the new entry of that vessel into the commercial salmon fishery if that owner is authorized to be issued a permit for the use of that new entry vessel pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8245.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 849, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8233.9.

Section 8101 does not apply to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8234.

(a) The department shall not issue a permit under this article unless one of the following first occurs:

(1) The applicant presents to the department a commercial fishing salmon stamp issued to the owner or an agent of the owner. No commercial fishing salmon stamp shall be presented or accepted by the department to authorize issuance of a permit under this section for more than one vessel. 

(2) The applicant obtains a commercial fishing salmon stamp and pays the fees for the stamp.

(3) On or before April 1 of the current license year, the owner is 70 years of age. 

(b) The first commercial fishing salmon stamp issued to an owner, or to that owner’s agent, shall be affixed to the commercial fishing license of that owner or agent. Any additional commercial fishing salmon stamps issued to the owner or the owner’s agent pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for purposes of obtaining permits for use of additional commercial salmon fishing vessels shall be affixed to each additional vessel’s registration issued pursuant to Section 7881.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 849, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8235.

(a) The owner of a permitted vessel, or that owner’s agent, may apply for renewal of the permit annually on or before April 30, upon payment of the fees established under subdivision (b), without penalty. Upon receipt of the application and fees, the department shall issue the permit for use of the permitted vessel in the subsequent permit year only to the owner of the permitted vessel.

(b) The department shall fix the annual fee for the renewal of the permit in an amount it determines to be necessary to pay the reasonable costs of implementing and administering this article.

(c) If an owner to whom a permit has been issued, or that owner’s agent, applies for renewal of the permit, the application for renewal shall be received or, if mailed, postmarked, on or before April 30. An application received or, if mailed, postmarked, after April 30 shall be assessed a late fee subject to Section 7852.2. The department shall issue the permit for use of the permitted vessel in the subsequent permit year.

(d) The department shall suspend a late fee otherwise due under subdivision (c) and shall issue a permit for use of the permitted vessel in the subsequent permit year if the department is unable to accept applications for renewal of permits by March 1.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the department shall not renew a permit for which the application for renewal is not received, or, if mailed, is received or postmarked after expiration of the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

8236.

(a) The department shall send a written notice of renewal and a permit renewal application to the owner of each currently permitted vessel at the most recent address of that owner in the records of the department. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail before March 1. The department shall mail a copy of the notice for renewal to all associations and groups known to the department to be representing commercial salmon fishermen. The department shall also provide blank permit renewal applications at appropriate offices of the department.

(b) The notice shall include all of the following:

(1) Instructions on how to apply for renewal of a permit.
